Tennessee, session 114, SB1240.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 33-1-307(b), is amended by deleting
the language "February 15 of each year" and substituting instead the language "March 1 of
each year".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1240
001452
- 1 -